Maine, session 132, LD1467.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1801, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Consumer. "Consumer" has the same meaning as in Title 10, section 1161,
subsection 1.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §1801, sub-§2-B is enacted to read:
2-B. Independent repair facility. "Independent repair facility" means a repair facility
that is not affiliated with a manufacturer or manufacturer's authorized dealer except a
manufacturer's authorized dealer or other entity within the network of repair facilities
certified by the manufacturer if the dealer or other entity is engaged in repair of a motor
vehicle that is not affiliated with the manufacturer.
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §1801, sub-§2-C is enacted to read:
2-C. Manufacturer. "Manufacturer" has the same meaning as in Title 10, section
1161, subsection 2.
Sec. 4. 29-A MRSA §1801, sub-§2-D is enacted to read:
2-D. Manufacturer's warranty. "Manufacturer's warranty" means an express
warranty provided by a manufacturer for a motor vehicle manufactured by the manufacturer
at the time of the sale of the motor vehicle.
Sec. 5. 29-A MRSA §1812 is enacted to read:
§1812. Liability for improper repairs by independent repair facilities
1. Liability for improper repairs. If an independent repair facility performs a repair
on a motor vehicle covered by a manufacturer's warranty and the repair fails to meet
industry standards or results in further damage or defect to the motor vehicle, the
independent repair facility is responsible for:
A. Reimbursing the consumer for any additional costs incurred by the consumer in
correcting the improper repair; and
B. Reimbursing a motor vehicle dealership or the manufacturer for any costs incurred
by the motor vehicle dealership or the manufacturer in correcting the improper repair.
2. Burden of proof. A motor vehicle dealership or manufacturer has the burden of
proof supported by sufficient evidence in establishing that an independent repair facility
improperly repaired a motor vehicle under subsection 1.
3. Disclosure to consumers. An independent repair facility performing a repair on a
consumer's motor vehicle under a manufacturer's warranty shall, prior to performing the
repair, disclose to the consumer in writing that:
A. The independent repair facility is not affiliated with the manufacturer or a motor
vehicle dealership; and
B. An improper repair under subsection 1 may result in an additional expense or
warranty conflict.
4. Exceptions. This section does not apply if:
Page 1 - 132LR2053(01)

A. An improper repair under subsection 1 was the result of inaccurate or incomplete
information provided by the consumer, the manufacturer or a motor vehicle dealership;
or
B. The repair was necessitated by misuse or neglect of the motor vehicle by the
consumer.
5. Unfair trade practice. The failure of an independent repair facility to reimburse a
consumer, motor vehicle dealership or manufacturer under subsection 1 constitutes an
unfair trade practice under the Maine Unfair Trade Practices Act.
6. Rules. The Secretary of State shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this
section. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules under Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.